Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1337
Mobile tracking devices; prohibited acts; consent; revocation.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 28-1338, a person shall not knowingly:

(a) Install a mobile tracking device on another person's property without the other person's consent;

(b) Cause a mobile tracking device to track the position or movement of another person or another person's property without the other person's consent; or

(c) Fail to remove or ensure the removal of a mobile tracking device that has been installed on another person's property with such person's consent when such consent has been revoked.

(2) For purposes of this section, if a person has given consent for another person to install a mobile tracking device on the consenting person's property, such consent shall be deemed to have been revoked if any of the following applies:

(a) The consenting person communicates to the person to whom consent was given that such consent is revoked;

(b) The consenting person and the person to whom consent was given are married and one of them files an action for divorce, annulment, or separate maintenance; or

(c) The consenting person receives a protection order against the person to whom consent was given. Revocation under this subdivision (2)(c) is effective when the person to whom consent was given has notice of such protection order.

Laws 2026, LB935, § 14.
July 18, 2026